California, session 20252026, AB2173.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19819 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19819. (a) The commission shall establish and maintain a general office for the transaction of its business in Sacramento. The commission may hold meetings at any place within the state when the interests of the public may be better served.(b) A public record of every vote shall be maintained at the commission’s principal office. office and posted on the commission’s internet website no later than the close of business of the second business day after the meeting at which the vote was taken.(c) A majority of the membership of the commission is a quorum of the commission. The concurring vote of three members of the commission shall be required for any official action of the commission or for the exercise of any of the commission’s duties, powers, or functions.(d) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code applies to meetings of the commission. Notwithstanding Section 11125.1 of the Government Code, documents, which documents that are filed with the commission by the department for the purpose of evaluating the qualifications of an applicant, applicant are exempt from disclosure under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 12012.79 of the Government Code is amended to read:12012.79.(a)The tribal-state gaming compact entered into in accordance with the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988 (18 U.S.C. Secs. 1166 to 1168, inclusive, and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.) between the State of California and the Agua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians, executed on August 4, 2016, is hereby ratified.(b)(1)In deference to tribal sovereignty, none of the following shall be deemed a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code):(A)The execution of any amendment to the tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(B)The execution of the tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(C)The execution of an intergovernmental agreement between a tribe and a county or city government negotiated pursuant to the express authority of, or as expressly referenced in, the tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(D)The execution of an intergovernmental agreement between a tribe and the Department of Transportation negotiated pursuant to the express authority of, or as expressly referenced in, the tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(E)The on-reservation impacts of compliance with the terms of the tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(F)The sale of compact assets, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 63048.6, or the creation of the special purpose trust established pursuant to Section 63048.65.(2)Except as expressly provided herein, this subdivision does not exempt a city, county, or city and county, or the Department of Transportation, from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act.